Maryland, session 2026, SB0923.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]

SENATE BILL 923 3
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund;
214. THE MARYLAND SOLAR PHOTOVOLTAIC MODULE
ENERGY SECURITY AND AFFORDABILITY FUND;
215. THE MARYLAND ENERGY STORAGE AND
AFFORDABILITY FUND; AND
216. THE MARYLAND ZERO–EMISSION VEHICLE ENERGY
SECURITY AND AFFORDABILITY FUND.
Article – State Government
9–2001.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Administration” means the Maryland Energy Administration.
(c) “Director” means the Director of the Maryland Energy Administration.
9–2018.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CHAIR” MEANS THE CHAIR OF THE COUNCIL.
(3) “COUNCIL” MEANS THE MARYLAND SOLAR PHOTOVOLTAIC
MODULE ENERGY SECURITY AND AFFORDABILITY FUND ADVISORY COUNCIL.
(4) “FUND” MEANS THE MARYLAND SOLAR PHOTOVOLTAIC MODULE
ENERGY SECURITY AND AFFORDABILITY FUND.
(B) (1) THERE IS A MARYLAND SOLAR PHOTOVOLTAIC MODULE
ENERGY SECURITY AND AFFORDABILITY FUND ADVISORY COUNCIL.
(2) THE COUNCIL CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(I) FIVE REPRESENTATIVES OF THE MANUFACTURERS, RETAIL
SELLERS, OR INSTALLERS OF SOLAR PHOTOVOLTAIC MODULES, DESIGNATED BY
THE CHAIR OF THE COUNCIL;
(II) TWO REPRESENTATIVES OF STAKEHOLDER

SENATE BILL 923
ORGANIZATIONS THAT ARE DIRECTLY RELATED TO THE PRODUCTION, ASSEMBLY,
OR DEVELOPMENT OF SOLAR PHOTOVOLTAIC MODULES, DESIGNATED BY THE
CHAIR OF THE COUNCIL; AND
(III) AS AN EX OFFICIO MEMBER, THE DIRECTOR OR THE
DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE.
(3) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
TERM OF OFFICE OF EACH DESIGNATED MEMBER IS 5 YEARS.
(II) 1. THE TERM OF A DESIGNATED MEMBER SHALL BE
STAGGERED, AS PROVIDED BY THE CHAIR.
2. AN INITIAL TERM OF A DESIGNATED MEMBER MAY
NOT EXCEED MORE THAN 5 YEARS.
(III) A DESIGNATED MEMBER MAY NOT SERVE MORE THAN 2
TERMS.
(IV) AT THE END OF A TERM, A DESIGNATED MEMBER
CONTINUES TO SERVE UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS DESIGNATED.
(V) A MEMBER WHO IS DESIGNATED AFTER A TERM HAS BEGUN
SERVES ONLY FOR THE REST OF THE TERM AND UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS DESIGNATED.
(4) THE DIRECTOR OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE SHALL SERVE AS
THE CHAIR OF THE COUNCIL.
(5) (I) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE
COUNCIL.
(II) THE ADMINISTRATION IS ENTITLED TO UP TO 5% OF THE
FEES DEPOSITED INTO THE FUND TO REIMBURSE THE ADMINISTRATION FOR THE
COSTS OF PROVIDING STAFF TO THE COUNCIL.
(6) A MEMBER OF THE COUNCIL:
(I) SHALL RECEIVE $100 PER DAY, FOR A MAXIMUM OF 36 DAYS
PER YEAR, FOR EACH DAY SPENT IN ATTENDANCE AT MEETINGS OF THE COUNCIL
OR ON THE BUSINESS OF THE COUNCIL; AND
(II) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER
THE STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE

SENATE BILL 923 5
BUDGET.
(C) THE COUNCIL SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE FUNDING FOR THE CREATION AND PUBLICATION OF
RESEARCH, COMMUNICATION, MARKETING, AND EDUCATIONAL CAMPAIGNS THAT:
(I) ARE ALIGNED WITH THE STATE’S CLEAN ENERGY GOALS;
(II) COMBAT MISINFORMATION RELATED TO SOLAR
PHOTOVOLTAIC TECHNOLOGY; AND
(III) EMPHASIZE THE BENEFITS AND AFFORDABILITY OF SOLAR
PHOTOVOLTAIC MODULES;
(2) COOPERATE WITH ANY LOCAL, STATE, OR NATIONAL
ORGANIZATION THAT IS ENGAGED IN THE PROMOTION OF SOLAR PHOTOVOLTAIC
MODULES;
(3) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE ADMINISTRATION REGARDING
POSSIBLE CONTRACTS OR AGREEMENTS WITH AN ENTITY IDENTIFIED IN ITEM (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION TO CARRY OUT JOINT RESEARCH, COMMUNICATION, MARKETING,
OR EDUCATIONAL CAMPAIGNS; AND
(4) SUBJECT TO THE APPROVAL OF THE ADMINISTRATION, CONDUCT
ANY ACTIVITIES TO CARRY OUT ANY CAMPAIGNS UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(D) THE CHAIR MAY ESTABLISH A CHECKOFF PROGRAM THAT APPLIES TO
SOLAR PHOTOVOLTAIC MODULES OR OTHER TECHNOLOGIES PROPOSED BY THE
COUNCIL.
(E) (1) THERE IS A MARYLAND SOLAR PHOTOVOLTAIC MODULE
ENERGY SECURITY AND AFFORDABILITY FUND.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE FUNDING TO THE
COUNCIL TO CARRY OUT THE DUTIES OF THE CHAIR AND THE COUNCIL UNDER
SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) THE COUNCIL SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(4) (I) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.

SENATE BILL 923
(II) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND
SEPARATELY, AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(5) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(I) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE
FUND;
(II) FEES PAID BY SOLAR PHOTOVOLTAIC MANUFACTURERS
AND RETAILERS UNDER SUBSECTION (F)(2) OF THIS SECTION;
(III) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED
FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(6) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR THE PURPOSES OF THE
COUNCIL UNDER SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(7) (I) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE
FUND IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(II) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE
CREDITED TO THE FUND.
(F) (1) ANY MONEY APPROPRIATED TO THE FUND IN THE STATE BUDGET
SHALL BE REPAID TO THE STATE FROM THE PROCEEDS OF THE FEE ESTABLISHED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) (I) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL IMPOSE A FEE OF $0.02 PER
WATT OF GENERATING CAPACITY ON SOLAR PHOTOVOLTAIC MODULES SOLD FOR
INSTALLATION IN THE STATE.
(II) THE FEE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH
APPLIES TO:
1. WHOLESALE AND RETAIL TRANSACTIONS, INCLUDING
ONLINE TRANSACTIONS TO BE SHIPPED TO A MARYLAND ADDRESS; AND
2. PURCHASES MADE BY INDIVIDUALS, BUSINESSES,
GOVERNMENTAL AGENCIES, AND ELECTRIC COMPANIES.

SENATE BILL 923 7
(III) THE COUNCIL MAY ADJUST THE FEE IMPOSED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH:
1. EVERY 2 YEARS; AND
2. IN ACCORDANCE WITH INFLATION AND THE NEEDS OF
THE COUNCIL.
(IV) THE FEE IMPOSED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH IN ANY SALE MAY NOT EXCEED THE LESSER OF:
1. 0.5% OF THE WHOLESALE VALUE OF THE SOLAR
PHOTOVOLTAIC MODULE SOLD; OR
2. AN AMOUNT SUFFICIENT TO PAY FOR THE
REASONABLE COSTS OF THE COUNCIL.
9–2019.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CHAIR” MEANS THE CHAIR OF THE COUNCIL.
(3) “COUNCIL” MEANS THE MARYLAND ENERGY STORAGE AND
AFFORDABILITY FUND ADVISORY COUNCIL.
(4) “ELECTRIC COMPANY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 1–101 OF
THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
(5) “ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEM” MEANS A COMMERCIALLY
AVAILABLE TECHNOLOGY THAT IS:
(I) CAPABLE OF ABSORBING ENERGY, STORING THE ENERGY
FOR A PERIOD OF TIME, AND THEREAFTER DISPATCHING THE ENERGY; AND
(II) 1. CENTRALIZED OR DISTRIBUTED; OR
2. OWNED BY AN ELECTRIC COMPANY, A RETAIL
ELECTRIC CUSTOMER, OR A THIRD PARTY.
(6) “FUND” MEANS THE MARYLAND ENERGY STORAGE AND
AFFORDABILITY FUND.

SENATE BILL 923
(7) “RETAIL ELECTRIC CUSTOMER” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN §
1–101 OF THE PUBLIC UTILITIES ARTICLE.
(B) (1) THERE IS A MARYLAND ENERGY STORAGE AND AFFORDABILITY
FUND ADVISORY COUNCIL.
(2) THE COUNCIL CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(I) AT LEAST FIVE REPRESENTATIVES OF THE
MANUFACTURERS, RETAIL SELLERS, OR INSTALLERS OF ENERGY STORAGE
SYSTEMS, DESIGNATED BY THE CHAIR;
(II) AT LEAST TWO REPRESENTATIVES OF STAKEHOLDER
ORGANIZATIONS THAT ARE DIRECTLY RELATED TO THE PRODUCTION, ASSEMBLY,
OR DEVELOPMENT OF ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS, DESIGNATED BY THE CHAIR; AND
(III) AS AN EX OFFICIO MEMBER, THE DIRECTOR, OR THE
DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE.
(3) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
TERM OF OFFICE OF EACH DESIGNATED MEMBER IS 5 YEARS.
(II) 1. THE TERM OF A DESIGNATED MEMBER SHALL BE
STAGGERED AS PROVIDED BY THE CHAIR.
2. AN INITIAL TERM OF A DESIGNATED MEMBER MAY
NOT EXCEED 5 YEARS.
(III) A DESIGNATED MEMBER MAY NOT SERVE MORE THAN 2
TERMS.
(IV) AT THE END OF A TERM, A DESIGNATED MEMBER
CONTINUES TO SERVE UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS DESIGNATED.
(V) A MEMBER WHO IS DESIGNATED AFTER A TERM HAS BEGUN
SERVES ONLY FOR THE REST OF THE TERM AND UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS DESIGNATED.
(4) THE DIRECTOR, OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE, SHALL SERVE AS
THE CHAIR OF THE COUNCIL.
(5) (I) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE
COUNCIL.

SENATE BILL 923 9
(II) THE ADMINISTRATION IS ENTITLED TO UP TO 5% OF THE
FEES DEPOSITED INTO THE FUND TO REIMBURSE THE ADMINISTRATION FOR THE
COSTS OF PROVIDING STAFF TO THE COUNCIL.
(6) A MEMBER OF THE COUNCIL:
(I) SHALL RECEIVE $100 PER DAY, FOR A MAXIMUM OF 36 DAYS
PER YEAR, FOR EACH DAY SPENT IN ATTENDANCE AT MEETINGS OF THE COUNCIL
OR ON THE BUSINESS OF THE COUNCIL; AND
(II) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER
THE STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE
BUDGET.
(C) THE COUNCIL SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE FUNDING FOR THE CREATION AND PUBLICATION OF
RESEARCH, COMMUNICATION, MARKETING, AND EDUCATIONAL CAMPAIGNS THAT:
(I) ARE ALIGNED WITH THE STATE’S CLEAN ENERGY GOALS;
(II) COMBAT MISINFORMATION RELATED TO ENERGY STORAGE
SYSTEMS; AND
(III) EMPHASIZE THE BENEFITS AND AFFORDABILITY OF
ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS;
(2) COOPERATE WITH ANY LOCAL, STATE, OR NATIONAL ENTITY THAT
IS ENGAGED IN THE PROMOTION OF ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS;
(3) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE ADMINISTRATION REGARDING
POSSIBLE CONTRACTS OR AGREEMENTS WITH AN ENTITY IDENTIFIED IN ITEM (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION TO CARRY OUT JOINT RESEARCH, COMMUNICATION, MARKETING,
OR EDUCATIONAL CAMPAIGNS; AND
(4) SUBJECT TO THE APPROVAL OF THE ADMINISTRATION, CONDUCT
ANY ACTIVITIES TO CARRY OUT ANY CAMPAIGNS UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(D) THE CHAIR MAY ESTABLISH A CHECKOFF PROGRAM THAT APPLIES TO
ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS OR OTHER TECHNOLOGIES PROPOSED BY THE
COUNCIL.

SENATE BILL 923
(E) (1) THERE IS A MARYLAND ENERGY STORAGE AND AFFORDABILITY
FUND.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE FUNDING TO THE
COUNCIL TO CARRY OUT THE DUTIES OF THE COUNCIL UNDER SUBSECTIONS (C)
AND (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) THE COUNCIL SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(4) (I) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(II) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND
SEPARATELY, AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(5) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(I) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE
FUND;
(II) FEES PAID BY ENERGY STORAGE MANUFACTURERS AND
RETAILERS UNDER SUBSECTION (F)(2) OF THIS SECTION;
(III) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED
FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(6) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR THE PURPOSES OF THE
COUNCIL UNDER SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(7) (I) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE
FUND IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(II) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE
CREDITED TO THE FUND.
(F) (1) ANY MONEY APPROPRIATED TO THE FUND IN THE STATE BUDGET
SHALL BE REPAID TO THE STATE FROM THE PROCEEDS OF THE FEE ESTABLISHED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) (I) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL IMPOSE A FEE OF $5 PER

SENATE BILL 923 11
KILOWATT–HOUR OF STORAGE CAPACITY ON ENERGY STORAGE SYSTEMS SOLD FOR
INSTALLATION IN THE STATE.
(II) THE FEE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH
APPLIES TO:
1. WHOLESALE AND RETAIL TRANSACTIONS, INCLUDING
ONLINE TRANSACTIONS TO BE SHIPPED TO A MARYLAND ADDRESS; AND
2. PURCHASES MADE BY INDIVIDUALS, BUSINESSES,
GOVERNMENT AGENCIES, AND ELECTRIC COMPANIES.
(III) THE COUNCIL MAY ADJUST THE FEE IMPOSED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH:
1. EVERY 2 YEARS; AND
2. IN ACCORDANCE WITH INFLATION AND THE NEEDS OF
THE COUNCIL.
(IV) THE FEE IMPOSED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH IN ANY SALE MAY NOT EXCEED THE LESSER OF:
1. 0.5% OF THE WHOLESALE VALUE OF THE ENERGY
STORAGE SYSTEM SOLD; OR
2. AN AMOUNT SUFFICIENT TO PAY FOR THE
REASONABLE COSTS OF THE COUNCIL.
9–2020.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “CHAIR” MEANS THE CHAIR OF THE COUNCIL.
(3) “COUNCIL” MEANS THE MARYLAND ZERO–EMISSION VEHICLE
ENERGY SECURITY AND AFFORDABILITY FUND ADVISORY COUNCIL.
(4) “FUND” MEANS THE MARYLAND ZERO–EMISSION VEHICLE
ENERGY SECURITY AND AFFORDABILITY FUND.
(B) (1) THERE IS A MARYLAND ZERO–EMISSION VEHICLE ENERGY

SENATE BILL 923
SECURITY AND AFFORDABILITY FUND ADVISORY COUNCIL.
(2) THE COUNCIL CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS:
(I) AT LEAST FIVE REPRESENTATIVES OF THE
MANUFACTURERS, RETAIL SELLERS, OR INSTALLERS OF ZERO–EMISSION VEHICLES,
DESIGNATED BY THE CHAIR;
(II) AT LEAST TWO REPRESENTATIVES OF STAKEHOLDER
ORGANIZATIONS THAT ARE DIRECTLY RELATED TO THE PRODUCTION, ASSEMBLY,
OR DEVELOPMENT OF ZERO–EMISSION VEHICLES, DESIGNATED BY THE CHAIR; AND
(III) AS AN EX OFFICIO MEMBER, THE DIRECTOR, OR THE
DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE.
(3) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
TERM OF OFFICE OF EACH MEMBER IS 5 YEARS.
(II) 1. THE TERM OF A DESIGNATED MEMBER SHALL BE
STAGGERED AS PROVIDED BY THE CHAIR.
2. AN INITIAL TERM OF A DESIGNATED MEMBER MAY
NOT EXCEED 5 YEARS.
(III) A MEMBER MAY NOT SERVE MORE THAN 2 TERMS.
(IV) AT THE END OF A TERM, A DESIGNATED MEMBER
CONTINUES TO SERVE UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS DESIGNATED.
(V) A MEMBER WHO IS DESIGNATED AFTER A TERM HAS BEGUN
SERVES ONLY FOR THE REST OF THE TERM AND UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS DESIGNATED.
(4) THE DIRECTOR, OR THE DIRECTOR’S DESIGNEE, SHALL SERVE AS
THE CHAIR OF THE COUNCIL.
(5) (I) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE
COUNCIL.
(II) THE ADMINISTRATION IS ENTITLED TO UP TO 5% OF THE
FEES DEPOSITED INTO THE FUND TO REIMBURSE THE ADMINISTRATION FOR THE
COSTS OF PROVIDING STAFF TO THE COUNCIL.
(6) A MEMBER OF THE COUNCIL:

SENATE BILL 923 13
(I) SHALL RECEIVE $100 PER DAY, FOR A MAXIMUM OF 36 DAYS
PER YEAR, FOR EACH DAY SPENT IN ATTENDANCE AT MEETINGS OF THE COUNCIL
OR ON THE BUSINESS OF THE COUNCIL; AND
(II) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER
THE STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE
BUDGET.
(C) THE COUNCIL SHALL:
(1) PROVIDE FUNDING FOR THE CREATION AND PUBLICATION OF
RESEARCH, COMMUNICATION, MARKETING, AND EDUCATIONAL CAMPAIGNS THAT:
(I) ARE ALIGNED WITH THE STATE’S CLEAN ENERGY GOALS;
(II) COMBAT MISINFORMATION RELATED TO ZERO–EMISSION
VEHICLES; AND
(III) EMPHASIZE THE BENEFITS AND AFFORDABILITY OF
ZERO–EMISSION VEHICLES;
(2) COOPERATE WITH ANY LOCAL, STATE, OR NATIONAL
ORGANIZATION THAT IS ENGAGED IN THE PROMOTION OF ZERO–EMISSION
VEHICLES;
(3) MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE ADMINISTRATION REGARDING
POSSIBLE CONTRACTS OR AGREEMENTS WITH AN ENTITY IDENTIFIED IN ITEM (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION TO CARRY OUT JOINT RESEARCH, COMMUNICATION, MARKETING,
OR EDUCATIONAL CAMPAIGNS; AND
(4) SUBJECT TO THE APPROVAL OF THE ADMINISTRATION, CONDUCT
ANY ACTIVITIES TO CARRY OUT ANY CAMPAIGNS UNDER ITEM (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(D) THE CHAIR MAY ESTABLISH A CHECKOFF PROGRAM THAT APPLIES TO
ZERO–EMISSION VEHICLES OR OTHER TECHNOLOGIES PROPOSED BY THE COUNCIL.
(E) (1) THERE IS A MARYLAND ZERO–EMISSION VEHICLE ENERGY
SECURITY AND AFFORDABILITY FUND.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE FUNDING TO THE
COUNCIL TO CARRY OUT THE DUTIES OF THE COUNCIL AND THE CHAIR UNDER

SENATE BILL 923
SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) THE COUNCIL SHALL ADMINISTER THE FUND.
(4) (I) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT ARTICLE.
(II) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND
SEPARATELY, AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(5) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(I) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE
FUND;
(II) FEES PAID BY ZERO–EMISSION VEHICLE MANUFACTURERS
AND RETAILERS UNDER SUBSECTION (F)(2) OF THIS SECTION;
(III) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED
FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(6) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR THE PURPOSES OF THE
COUNCIL UNDER SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (D) OF THIS SECTION.
(7) (I) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE
FUND IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(II) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE
CREDITED TO THE FUND.
(F) (1) ANY MONEY APPROPRIATED TO THE FUND IN THE STATE BUDGET
SHALL BE REPAID TO THE STATE FROM THE PROCEEDS OF THE FEE ESTABLISHED
UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) (I) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL IMPOSE A FEE OF $200 FOR
EACH ZERO–EMISSION VEHICLE SOLD IN THE STATE.
(II) THE FEE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH
APPLIES TO:
1. WHOLESALE AND RETAIL TRANSACTIONS, INCLUDING

SENATE BILL 923 15
ONLINE TRANSACTIONS TO BE SHIPPED TO A MARYLAND ADDRESS; AND
2. PURCHASES MADE BY INDIVIDUALS, BUSINESSES,
GOVERNMENT AGENCIES, AND ELECTRIC COMPANIES.
(III) THE COUNCIL MAY ADJUST THE FEE IMPOSED UNDER
SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH:
1. EVERY 2 YEARS; AND
2. IN ACCORDANCE WITH INFLATION AND THE NEEDS OF
THE COUNCIL.
(IV) THE FEE IMPOSED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH IN ANY SALE MAY NOT EXCEED THE LESSER OF:
1. 0.5% OF THE WHOLESALE VALUE OF THE
ZERO–EMISSION VEHICLE SOLD; OR
2. AN AMOUNT SUFFICIENT TO PAY FOR THE
REASONABLE COSTS OF THE COUNCIL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.